Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-141
Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice; planning programs; consistent with planning policies of Governor's Policy Research Office.

The planning programs of the Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice shall be consistent with the planning policies of the Governor's Policy Research Office.

Laws 1969, c. 775, § 14, p. 2947;

Laws 1979, LB 412, § 20.

Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice, powers and duties, see section 81-1423.